Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201313-2709
Information
on grants; department; duties.

The department shall submit, as part of the department's
annual status report under section 81-1201.11, the following information regarding the Civic and Community Center Financing Act:

(1) Information documenting
the grants conditionally approved for funding by the Legislature in the following
fiscal year;

(2) Reasons
why a full application was not sent to any municipality seeking assistance
under the act;

(3) The amount of sales tax revenue generated for the fund pursuant
to subsection (4) of section 13-2610 and subsection (6) of section 13-3108,
the total amount of grants applied for under the act, the year-end fund balance,
and, if all available funds have not been committed to funding grants under
the act, an explanation of the reasons why all such funds have not been so
committed;

(4) The amount of appropriated funds actually expended by the department
for the year;

(5) The department's current budget for administration of the act
and the department's planned use and distribution of funds, including details
on the amount of funds to be expended on grants and the amount of funds to
be expended by the department for administrative purposes; and

(6) Grant
summaries, including the applicant municipality, project description, grant
amount requested, amount and type of matching funds, and reasons for approval
or denial based on evaluation criteria from section 13-2707 or 13-2707.01
for every application seeking assistance under the act.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB404, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 10.